Hawaii statutes.
§243-11 Failure to make and file statements
and making false statement unlawful. It shall be unlawful for any
distributor, or any other person, to fail, neglect, or refuse to make and file
any statement required by this chapter in the manner or within the time therein
provided or to make any such statement which is false in any particular. [L
1932 1st, c 19, §8; RL 1935, §2017; am L Sp 1941, c 26, pt of §1; RL 1945,
§5410; RL 1955, §123-8; HRS §243-11]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next